New York, session 2025-2026, S4821.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 145.23 of the penal law, as amended by chapter 353 2 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 145.23 Cemetery desecration in the [first] second degree. 4 A person is guilty of cemetery desecration in the [first] second 5 degree when with intent to damage property of another person, and having 6 no right to do so nor any reasonable ground to believe that [he] the 7 person has such right, [he] the person: 8 (a) damages any real or personal property maintained as a cemetery 9 plot, grave, burial place or other place of interment of human remains 10 [in an amount exceeding two hundred fifty dollars]; or 11 (b) with intent to steal personal property, [he] the person steals 12 personal property[, the value of which exceeds two hundred fifty 13 dollars,] which is located at a cemetery plot, grave, burial place or 14 other place of interment of human remains and which property is owned by 15 the person or organization which maintains or owns such place or the 16 estate, next-of-kin or representatives of the deceased person interred 17 there[; or 18 (c) commits the crime of cemetery desecration in the second degree as 19 defined in section 145.22 of this article and has been previously 20 convicted of the crime of cemetery desecration in the second degree 21 within the preceding five years]. 22 Cemetery desecration in the [first] second degree is a class E felony. 23 § 2. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 145.24 to read 24 as follows: 25 § 145.24 Cemetery desecration in the first degree. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00576-01-5 S. 4821 2 1 A person is guilty of cemetery desecration in the first degree when 2 such person commits the crime of cemetery desecration in the second 3 degree as defined in section 145.23 of this article and has been previ- 4 ously convicted of the crime of cemetery desecration in the second 5 degree or cemetery desecration in the first degree within the preceding 6 five years. 7 Cemetery desecration in the first degree is a class D felony. 8 § 3. Section 145.22 of the penal law is REPEALED. 9 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 10 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.